Tennessee, session 114, HB1488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "County" includes a county with a metropolitan or charter form of
government; and
(2) "Local rules of procedure" means a set of formal, written regulations
adopted by a legislative body to govern the conduct of its own internal business.
(b) The local rules of procedure adopted by a county legislative body become
the temporary local rules of procedure for a newly elected county legislative body until
acted upon pursuant to subsection (c).
(c) Within ninety (90) days of convening a newly elected county legislative body,
the county legislative body shall adopt local rules of procedure by majority vote.
(d) If changes to the local rules of procedure are proposed during that term after
the adoption pursuant to subsection (c), the changes must be approved by a two-thirds
(2/3) majority vote of the county legislative body.
(e) If a question arises that is not addressed in the local rules of procedure, the
question is governed by the latest edition of Robert's Rules of Order.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1488
009222
- 1 -